Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1102.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 2, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-249.20, to read: START_STATUTE15-249.20. Quality early childhood education supplemental assistance grant program; eligibility; program requirements; definitions A. The quality early childhood education supplemental assistance grant program is established in the department of education to provide early childhood learning services to children from low-income families. B. The department of education shall: 1. Establish application procedures for eligible providers that wish to apply to participate in the grant program. A provider is eligible to participate in the grant program if the provider meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is Either: (i) a recipient or subrecipient of federal grant monies to provide comprehensive child development services through a program offered under the head start act (p.l. 97-35; 95 stat. 499; 42 united states code sections 9831 through 9852c). (ii) A school district that receives federal monies to provide a preschool program pursuant to title I of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 (p.l. 89-10; 79 stat. 27; 20 united states code sections 6313 through 6315). (b) Demonstrates the need for additional services in the provider's service area. (c) Demonstrates the ability to expand staff, space or services to serve additional children if the provider receives additional funding. 2. Award need-based grants beginning in the 2026-2027 school year that prioritize providers that serve children from low-income families. the department may establish criteria for determining priority for need-based grants pursuant to this PARAGRAPH. Grant monies awarded and distributed pursuant to this paragraph shall supplement and not supplant existing state and federal funding for early childhood learning services. 3. Establish policies and procedures to implement the grant program that require each participating provider to provide early childhood learning services that meet or exceed the quality standards that apply to the comprehensive child development services that are provided through the head start program or title i preschool program, whichever applies.  The policies and procedures established pursuant to this paragraph shall require the provider do all of the following: (a) Coordinate funding to ensure, to the extent possible based on community demographics, mixed-income classrooms with at least one teacher and teaching assistant, or two teachers, for every twenty children. (b) Use Research-based curriculum and assessment. (c) Use Developmentally appropriate programs that include learning experiences relating to language, literacy, social skills, emotional regulation, math, science, social studies, creative arts and physical development. (d) Provide A learning environment that includes: (i) Developmentally appropriate schedules, lesson plans, indoor learning experiences and outdoor learning experiences. (ii) teacher-directed and child-initiated activities. (iii) active learning activities and quiet learning activities. (iv) Individual, small group and large group learning activities. (v) Opportunities for choice, play, exploration and experimentation among a variety of learning, sensory and motor experiences. (e) Ensure That At least ten percent of children who receive services that are funded, including partial funding, by a grant pursuant to this section are children with a disability. (f) Provide all services to a child with a disability in the least restrictive environment possible and ensure that each child with a disability fully participates in all program activities. (g) Provide any necessary accommodations for children with a disability to access facilities, equipment, materials or supplies that are accessible by other children who receive services from the provider. (h) Complete or obtain a current developmental screening for each child not later than forty-five days after the child begins receiving services from the provider.  If necessary, the provider shall refer the family to the school district that is responsible for conducting an evaluation pursuant to section 15-766. (i) Offer opportunities for each child's parents and family members to be involved in the education services, including establishing a parent council.  A provider may satisfy the requirements of this subdivision by including parents in an existing parent council on the same terms as parents whose children receive services pursuant to a federally funded program. (j) Provide nutritious meals, movement activities and hearing and vision screening. (k) partner with members of the community who can support children's mental, dental and physical health. (l) Secure ongoing early childhood mental health consultations at least once per month and provide screening or referrals, or both, for children who need additional support as necessary. (m) Establish and implement a system of health and safety practices to ensure that children are safe at all times and provide sufficient training to employees to ensure compliance with the system. (n) Provide orientation training to all new employees who will provide services directly to children not later than three months after the date of hire. (o) Provide ongoing training to all employees on health, safety and child care requirements developed by the program or by federal, state, local and, if applicable, tribal governments. (p) Ensure that families have language access to the program and, as applicable, offer dual language education opportunities that both set the FOUNDATION for biliteracy and ensure that emergent bilingual children have full access to the curriculum and instruction. 4. Coordinate with public and private providers of early childhood learning services, including, if applicable, any of the following: (a) One or more regional partnership councils established pursuant to title 8, chapter 13, article 2. (b) an association of RECIPIENTs or SUBRECIPIENTs, or both, OF FEDERAL GRANT MONIES TO PROVIDE COMPREHENSIVE CHILD DEVELOPMENT SERVICES THROUGH A HEAD START PROGRAM. (c) other agencies involved with early childhood development and health issues. c. For the purposes of this section: 1. "child with a disability" has the same meaning prescribed in section 15-761. 2. "Low-income family" means a family whose gross household income is at or below one hundred percent of the federal poverty level. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; department of education; grant program; intent A. The sum of $175,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of education for the quality early childhood education supplemental assistance grant program established by section 15-249.20, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act. B. The legislature intends that the appropriation made in subsection A of this section be considered ongoing.